Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 935.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 935.9. A. The Board of Trustees shall contract with
one or more business entities in order to create a range of choices
regarding investment of funds deposited into defined contribution
system accounts. The investment options shall be substantially
similar to the options provided to members of the Oklahoma Public
Employees Retirement System that maintain a Deferred Savings
Incentive Plan account as offered by the System pursuant to the
provisions of the Deferred Savings Incentive Plan. In selecting
Req. No. 13939 Page 1

inve stment options for participants in the plan, the Board shall
give due consideration to offering investment options provided by
business entities that provide guaranteed lifetime income in
retirement such as annuities, guaranteed investment contracts, or
similar products. The Board may amend any of its existing contracts
with its current service providers to perform substantially the same
type of service the provider is currently performing for the Board,
in order to facilitate the timely introduction of the new defined
contribution system created by this act. Thereafter, the
contracting process for the selection of service providers carrying
out duties related to the administration of the plan shall be the
same as the selection process for other providers selected by the
Board under subsection D of Section 909.1 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. In addition to the range of choices provided to participants
pursuant to subsection A of this section, participants shall also
have the option to exercise independent control over the investment
of their individual accounts, including, but not limited to,
investing in other assets outside of the plan in determining their
investments under the plan.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13939 CMA 12/15/25

Req. No. 13939 Page 2